src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON MINUNGKVE
:у INF ; !!≈ @CODE@
 PRSPRC ;
+PrsPrc:%{VU%}%>%{ыиØ%}%>н VERB_K ; !ханищтахтын
+PrsPrc:%>%{аяØ%}%>н VERB_K ; !ханищтахтан
:%{VU%}%>%{ыиØ%} ACTIO ;
:%>%{аяØ%} PRFPRC ;

:%{VU%}%>%{ыиØ%} GER ;
:%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_VU ;

+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1:асум VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2:асын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3:ас VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1:асаме̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2:асы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2:асын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3:асы̄г VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3:асыг VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:асув VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:асӯв VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2:асы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2:асын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3:асыт VERB_K ;

: V11_MUTUAL_PASS ;

LEXICON JOXTUNGKVE
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:%{VU%}%>%{уюØ%} INF ;
:%{VU%} PRSPRC ; !cf U2C %{VU%}ы
!:%{VU%} V11_MUTUAL ;
:%{VU%}%>%{уюØ%} PRFPRC ;
:%{VU%}%>%{ыиØ%} GER ;!+Actio
:%{VU%}%>%{ыиØ%} ACTIO ;
+Der+Der/Ap+N:%{VU%}%>ап N_VCH ;
:%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_VU ;
:ы%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRT_OCDU/PL_VU ;!cf U2C with %{VU%}
:%{VU%} ACT_IMPRT_VU ;!all
:%{VU%} ACT_COND_VU ;!all

:ы%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRT_SC_VU ; ! ёхтысум!cf U2C %{VU%}
:ы%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRT_OCSG_slameen ; ! ёхтысаныл the plural is specialCHECKME !cf U2C %{VU%}
:%{VU%}у PASS_PRT ;!cf U2C %{VU%}
:%{VU%}%>%{аяØ%} PASS_PRS_VU ;
:%{VU%} PASS_COND ;


LEXICON IND_PRS_TEENGKVE
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:%>ум VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:%>ын VERB_K ;
!+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:%>нын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1:%>ме̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:%>ын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+Use/NG:%>ы̄н VERB_K ;!2017: 134
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3:%>ыг VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+Err/Orth:%>ы̄г VERB_K ;!2017: 134, but Jaska 20230901, AGAINST tengkwe
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:%>ув VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:%>ӯв VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:%>ын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+Use/NG:%>ы̄н VERB_K ;!2017: 134
 ACT_IND_PRS_SCPL3_yt ;

!! ## Stems ending in C
LEXICON V_NSHU   !!≈ @CODE@ йинуӈкве
 V_U2C ;!2023-11-18

LEXICON V_NSSU  !!≈ @CODE@ о̄ньщуӈкве
 V_U2C ;!2023-11-18

LEXICON V_U !!≈ @CODE@ 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:%{VU%}%>%{уюØ%} INF ;
:%{VU%} PRSPRC ; ! This will need some variants with onset vowel.
!:%{VU%} V11_MUTUAL ;
:%{VU%}%>%{уюØ%} PRFPRC ;
+PrfPrc:%{VU%}%>%{ЫИ%}%>м # ;!CheckMe diff tag
:%{VU%}%>%{ыиØ%} GER ;!+Ger?+Actio
:%{VU%}%>%{ыиØ%} ACTIO ;
+Der+Der/Ap+N:%{VU%}%>ап N_VCH ;
:%{VU%} ACT_IND_VU ;
:%{VU%} ACT_IMPRT_VU ;!all
:%{VU%} ACT_COND_VU ;!all

:%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRT_SC_VU ;
:%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRT_OCSG_slameen ;
:%{VU%} PASS_PRT ;
:%{VU%}%>%{аяØ%} PASS_PRS_VU ;
+Err/Orth:%{VU%}%>а̄ V11_MUTUAL_PASS_PRS ;
+Err/Orth:%{VU%}%>я̄ V11_MUTUAL_PASS_PRS ;
:%{VU%} PASS_COND ;

LEXICON V_U2C !This has two consonants before -уӈкве (voiced)
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:%{VU%}%>%{уюØ%} INF ;
:%{VU%}ы PRSPRC ; ! 2023-11-17
!:%{VU%} V11_MUTUAL ;
:%{VU%}%>%{уюØ%} PRFPRC ;
:%{VU%}%>%{ыиØ%} GER ;!+Ger?+Actio
:%{VU%}%>%{ыиØ%} ACTIO ;
+Der+Der/Ap+N:%{VU%}%>ап N_VCH ;
!:%{VU%} ACT_IND_VU ;  2023-11-18
:%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_VU ;!2023-11-18


:%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRT_OCDU/PL_VU ;!2023-11-18 JOXTUNGKVE ы%{VU%}
 
:%{VU%} ACT_IMPRT_VU ;!all
:%{VU%} ACT_COND_VU ;!all
:%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRT_SC_VU ;!2023-11-18 JOXTUNGKVE ы%{VU%}

:%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRT_OCSG_slameen ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg:%{VU%}%>ысаныл VERB_K ;!2023-11-18 NEEDWORK

:%{VU%} PASS_PRT ;!2023-11-18 JOXTUNGKVE %{VU%}у
:%{VU%}%>%{аяØ%} PASS_PRS_VU ;!CHECKME
+Err/Orth:%{VU%}%>а̄ V11_MUTUAL_PASS_PRS ;
+Err/Orth:%{VU%}%>я̄ V11_MUTUAL_PASS_PRS ;
:%{VU%} PASS_COND ;

LEXICON V_Y/U !This has two consonants, one is onset before -уӈкве
!(вл|гл|пл|сл|йл|щл|тл)уӈкве
!(рг|мг|нг|сг)уӈкве
!(рс|мс|мщ|хщ|ньщ)уӈкве
!(км|вм|рм|йм)уӈкве
!(гр|ӈр)уӈкве
!(ӈх)уӈкве
!(рн)уӈкве
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:%{VU%}%>%{уюØ%} INF ;
:%{VU%}ы PRSPRC ; ! 2023-11-17
!:%{VU%} V11_MUTUAL ;
:%{VU%}%>%{уюØ%} PRFPRC ;
:%{VU%}%>%{ыиØ%} GER ;!+Ger?+Actio
:%{VU%}%>%{ыиØ%} ACTIO ;
+Der+Der/Ap+N:%{VU%}%>ап N_VCH ;
!:%{VU%} ACT_IND_VU ;  2023-11-18
:%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_VU ;!2023-11-18


:%{VU%}ы ACT_IND_PRT_OCDU/PL_VU ;!2023-11-18
 
:%{VU%} ACT_IMPRT_VU ;!all
:%{VU%} ACT_COND_VU ;!all
:%{VU%}ы ACT_IND_PRT_SC_VU ;!2023-11-18

:%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRT_OCSG_slameen ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg:%{VU%}%>ысаныл VERB_K ;!2023-11-18 NEEDWORK

:%{VU%}у PASS_PRT ;!2023-11-18 
:%{VU%}%>%{аяØ%} PASS_PRS_VU ;!CHECKME
+Err/Orth:%{VU%}%>а̄ V11_MUTUAL_PASS_PRS ;
+Err/Orth:%{VU%}%>я̄ V11_MUTUAL_PASS_PRS ;
:%{VU%} PASS_COND ;

LEXICON INF
+Inf:ӈкве VERB_K ;
+Inf+Err/Orth:ӈкв VERB_K ;

LEXICON V_A
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:%{VA%}%>%{аяØ%} INF ;
:%{VA%}%>%{аяØ%} PRSPRC ; !Does this exist ?20230504 
+PrsPrc:%{VA%}%>%{аяØ%}н # ; ! This will need some variants with onset vowel.
:%{VA%} V11_MUTUAL ;
:%{VA%}%>%{аяØ%} ACT_IND_PRT_SC_VA ;
:%{VA%}%>%{аяØ%} V11_MUTUAL_PASS ;
:%{VA%}%>%{аяØ%} V11_MUTUAL_IND_PRT_OC3 ;

! extras for V_A 2023_04_29
:%{VA%}%>%{аяØ%} ACT_COND_VU ;
:%{VA%}	ACT_IMPRT_for_V_A ;
:%{VA%}%>%{аяØ%} PASS_COND ;!add vowel where there was none 2023_05_02

LEXICON V11_MUTUAL 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:%>%{аяØ%} PRFPRC ;
:%>%{ыиØ%} GER ;!ым +Ger?+Actio
:%>%{ыиØ%} ACTIO ;
+Der+Der/Ap+N:%>ап N_VCH ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_VA ;
 ACT_IMPRT ;
! V11_MUTUAL-COND	  ;
!
LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_VA 
!! 	* **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:%>%{ЭЕLong%}гум VERB_K ;
+Err/Orth+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:%>%{ЭЕ%}гын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:%>%{ЭЕLong%}гын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:%>%{ЫИ%} VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1:%>%{ЫИ%}ме̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:%>%{ЭЕLong%}гын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:%>%{ЭЕ%}гы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3:%>%{ЭЕLong%}г VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:%>%{ЭЕLong%}в VERB_K ;
+Err/Orth+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:%>%{ЭЕ%}в VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:%>%{ЭЕLong%}гын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:%>%{ЭЕ%}гы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:%>%{ЭЕLong%}гыт VERB_K ;
!
:%>%{ЫИ%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCSG_lameen ;
:%>%{ЫИ%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCDU ;
:%>%{ЫИ%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCPL ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_OCSG_lameen
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg:лум VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg:лын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg:тэ VERB_K ; ! XXX Long ? тотытэ vs. тоты̄тэ
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg:ламе̄н VERB_K ;!distinction
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg:лын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg:лы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg:тэ̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg:лув VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg:лын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg:лы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg:%>%{аяØ%}ныл VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg+Err/Orth:%>%{аяLong%}ныл VERB_K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_OCSG_lumeen
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg:лум VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg:лын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg:тэ VERB_K ; ! XXX Long ? тотытэ vs. тоты̄тэ
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg:луме̄н VERB_K ;!distinction
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg:лын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg:лы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg:тэ̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg+Err/Orth:тэн VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg:лув VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg:лӯв VERB_K ;! JMR 20230503 and тотылӯв and лыглӯв 20230901
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg:лын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg:лы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg:%>%{аяØ%}ныл VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg+Err/Orth:%>%{аяLong%}ныл VERB_K ;
