src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
минуӈкве+V:мин MINUNGKVE "13_odd_уйти" ;
а̄стуӈкве+V:а̄ст JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_окончиться" ;!JOXTUNGKVE?
а̄хвсала̄нтуӈкве+V:а̄хвсала̄нт V_U2C "23_odd_" ;
аюӈкве+V:ай V_U "12_odd_пить" ;
ва̄гта̄лпатантаӈкве+V:ва̄гта̄лпатант V_A "23_even_слабеть, уставать" ;
ва̄нтлуӈкве+V:ва̄нтл V_Y/U "13_odd_переезжать" ;
во̄вуӈкве+V:во̄в V_U "11_odd_призвать /лозвать/" ;
волтуӈкве+V:волт V_U2C "23_odd_обтесать" ;
вольгалтахтуӈкве+v1+V:вольгалтахт JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_засверкать /о молнии/" ;
восгуӈкве+V:восг V_Y/U "21_odd_шептать" ;
во̄тантаӈкве+V:во̄тант V_A "23_even_" ;
е̄мтуӈкве+V:е̄мт V_U "23_odd_случиться /произойти/, появиться" ;
ёнгуӈкве+V:ёнг V_Y/U "21_odd_играть" ;
ёслуӈкве+V:ёсл V_Y/U "23_odd_замочить" ;!U/A pair? !Listed in Ромбандеева 2005a: 87.
ёхтуӈкве+V:ёхт JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_наступить /начаться/" ;!U/A pair?
икщамтаӈкве+V:икщамт V_A "23_even_брезгать " ;
йинсуӈкве+V:йинс V_NSHU "27_odd_скроить" ;
ка̄ньщуӈкве+V:ка̄ньщ V_NSSU "28_odd_" ;
ка̄ртуӈкве+V:ка̄рт V_U2C "23_odd_закоченеть, загустeть /о крови/" ;
ква̄лттыгла̄луӈкве+V:ква̄лттыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_" ;
кинсуӈкве+V:кинс V_NSHU "27_odd_искать" ;
кисгуӈкве+V:кисг V_Y/U "21_odd_свистать" ;
китапахтуӈкве+V:китапахт JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_расспросить" ;
консуӈкве+V:конс V_NSHU "27_odd_царапать" ;
котараӈкве+V:котар V_A "11_even_жечь" ;
лаквтуӈкве+V:лаквт V_U "23_odd_оттеснить" ;
ликмуӈкве+V:ликм V_Y/U "21_odd_попасть /в ловушку/" ;
ловиньта̄нтуӈкве+V:ловиньта̄нт V_U2C "23_odd_прочитывать" ;
лотатаӈкве+V:лотат V_A "13_even_хрустнуть /быстро/" ;
луйгалтахтуӈкве+V:луйгалтахт JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_защебетать" ;
лэ̄пуӈкве+V:лэ̄п V_U "11_odd_" ;
лю̄камта̄нтуӈкве+V:лю̄камта̄нт V_U2C "23_odd_унижать" ;
лю̄ньщуӈкве+v1+V:лю̄ньщ V_NSSU "28_odd_плакать" ;
лю̄ньщуӈкве+v2+V:люньщ V_NSSU "28_odd_плакать" ;
ля̄сгуӈкве+V:ля̄сг V_Y/U "21_odd_цокать" ;
манумта̄нтуӈкве+V:манумта̄нт V_U2C "23_odd_" ;
масхатуӈкве+V:масхат MINUNGKVE "13_even_одеться" ;
масыглаӈкве+V:масыгл V_A ;
мувиньтаптуӈкве+V:мувиньтапт JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_смешить, рассмешить" ;
мӯрмуӈкве+V:мӯрм V_Y/U "21_odd_нырнуть" ;
намая̄луӈкве+V:намая̄л V_U ;
нёлантаӈкве+V:нёлант V_A "23_even_лизать" ;
нё̄рыгла̄нтуӈкве+V:нё̄рыгла̄нт V_U2C "23_odd_пробиваться /через препятствие/" ;
нуйхатуӈкве+V:нуйхат V_U "13_even_пронестись" ;
нэ̄глапахтуӈкве+V:нэ̄глапахт JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_" ;
няӈрамаӈкве+V:няӈрам V_A "11_even_разбушеваться /о буре/" ;
няслуӈкве+v1+V:нясл V_Y/U "23_odd_удить" ;
онтыстахтуӈкве+V:онтыстахт JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_опираться" ;
о̄ньщуӈкве+V:о̄ньщ V_NSSU "28_odd_иметь//владеть" ;!Possibly U2C.
паргалтаӈкве+V:паргалт V_A "23_even_посеять" ;
пасуӈкве+V:пас V_U "15_odd_пахнуть" ;
паттала̄нтуӈкве+V:паттала̄нт V_U2C "23_odd_" ;
пащалахтуӈкве+V:пащалахт JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_здороваться" ;
поварттахтыглуӈкве+V:поварттахтыгл V_Y/U "кантовать" ;  
по̄икщаӈкве+V:по̄икщ V_A "26_even_молиться" ;
понсуӈкве+V:понс V_NSHU "27_odd_созреть" ;
постыгла̄луӈкве+V:постыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_намечать" ;
постыгла̄нтуӈкве+V:постыгла̄нт V_U2C "23_odd_рассветать" ;
потыртахтуӈкве+V:потыртахт JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_договориться" ;
прове̄ряйтаӈкве+V:прове̄ряйт V_A "23_even_проверять" ;
пӯнсуӈкве+V:пӯнс V_NSHU "27_odd_" ;
ро̄ӈхуӈкве+V:ро̄ӈх V_Y/U "21_odd_гудеть" ;
рохтуӈкве+V:рохт JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_испугаться" ;
рощуӈкве+V:рощ V_U "16_odd_медлить" ;
рӯпитаӈкве+V:рӯпит V_A "работать, трудиться" ;
са̄ӈхвасантуӈкве+V:са̄ӈхвасант V_U2C "23_odd_ударять /ногой/" ;
со̄ймуӈкве+V:со̄йм V_Y/U "21_odd_исчезнуть" ;
со̄салтахтуӈкве+V:со̄салтахт JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_" ;
сунсуӈкве+V:сунс V_NSHU "27_odd_смотреть" ;
та̄гиньтаптыгла̄луӈкве+V:та̄гиньтаптыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_наполнять" ;
тагмахта̄нтаӈкве+V:тагмахта̄нт V_A "23_even_прицепляться" ;
талквама̄нтуӈкве+V:талквама̄нт V_U2C "23_odd_понижаться" ;
тинсуӈкве+V:тинс V_NSHU "27_odd_искать" ;
тистуӈкве+V:тист JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_вздыхать " ;
то̄вмуӈкве+V:то̄вм V_Y/U "21_odd_укусить" ;
тӯщтыгпа̄нтуӈкве+V:тӯщтыгпа̄нт V_U2C "23_odd_закалывать /что-л булавкой/" ;
тэ̄лыгла̄луӈкве+V:тэ̄лыгла̄л V_A "13_odd_" ;
тэ̄лыгта̄луӈкве+V:тэ̄лыгта̄л V_U ;
унсуӈкве+V:унс V_NSHU "27_odd_переплыть /на лодке/" ;
ӯнттуӈкве+V:ӯнтт JOXTUNGKVE "33_odd_поставить /поместить что-л подо что-л/" ;
ханищтахтуӈкве+V:ханищтахт MINUNGKVE "23_odd_заниматься /учиться/" ;
хансуӈкве+V:ханс V_NSHU "27_odd_писать" ;
ханьщуӈкве+V:ханьщ V_NSSU "28_odd_угадать" ;
харгуӈкве+v2+V:ха̄рг V_Y/U "21_odd_трещать" ;
хассумтантуӈкве+V:хассумтант V_U2C "23_odd_дёргать" ;
хилыгла̄луӈкве+V:хилыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_" ;
хопгалтахтуӈкве+V:хопгалтахт JOXTUNGKVE "23_odd_звукоподражание крйку глухаря" ;
хосгащлаӈкве+V:хосгащл V_A "23_even_помахать" ;
хӯнсуӈкве+V:хӯнс V_NSHU "27_odd_жечь несов" ;
щалтапа̄нтуӈкве+V:щалтапа̄нт V_U2C "23_odd_" ;
щарктахтуӈкве+V:щарктахт JOXTUNGKVE "23_even_пищать /о птенцах/" ;
щё̄питахтыгла̄луӈкве+V:щё̄питахтыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_собираться" ;
щисгуӈкве-ня̄ӈхуӈкве+V:щисгуӈкве-ня̄ӈх V_Y/U "21_odd_пищать" ; ! XXX check double verb
юнсуӈкве+V:юнс V_NSHU "27_odd_дремать" ;
ялтуӈкве+V:ялт V_U2C "23_odd_ожӣть" ;
